Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-3-43.
Board to provide and designate building for its meetings and sessions of court when courthouse unavailable.

When there shall not be a courthouse in any county, or the same may be undergoing repairs, or unfit for use, the board of supervisors may meet at a convenient place in the county and shall provide and designate some suitable building in which the courts of the county and the meetings of the board of supervisors may be held, the expense of which, and for fitting the same for the purpose, shall be paid out of the county treasury. If the board shall fail to make such provision, the sheriff of the county may do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 23; 1871, § 1370; 1880, § 2151; 1892, § 306; 1906, § 325; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3698; 1930, § 220; 1942, § 2895.

§ 19-3-44.
Alternate court facilities in counties containing two judicial districts.

The board of supervisors of any county in which there are two (2) judicial districts may provide alternate facilities for the courts of one judicial district when the courthouse of such district is in a condition of disrepair due to damage or construction. Such alternate facilities may be located in the other judicial district of the county and may be located in the courthouse of such other judicial district, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to require such facilities to be located in said courthouse if, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, some other location is preferred.

The several courts of any county wherein there are two (2) judicial districts may by order duly entered on the minutes of the court remove the court to the alternate facility provided by the board of supervisors located in the other judicial district when such transfer is required as provided herein and in such event no cause of action shall be defeated, delayed or otherwise impeded based upon a challenge to the jurisdiction of the court or a question of venue which results from such transfer.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only for such period as the court is prevented from sitting in the proper judicial district due to physical condition of the proper courthouse.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 332, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1974).

§ 19-3-45.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 61, eff from and after January 2, 1989.

[Codes, 1942, § 2957; Laws, 1938, ch. 300; Laws, 1946, ch. 479]

§ 19-3-47.
Employment of counsel.

The board of supervisors shall have the power, in its discretion, to employ counsel by the year at an annual salary at an amount that it deems proper, not to exceed the maximum annual amount authorized by law for payment to a member of the board.

The board of supervisors shall have the power, in its discretion, to employ counsel in all civil cases in which the county is interested, including eminent domain proceedings, the examination and certification of title to property the county is acquiring and in criminal cases against a county officer for malfeasance or dereliction of duty in office, when by the criminal conduct of the officer the county may be liable to be affected pecuniarily, with the counsel to conduct the proceeding instead of the district attorney, or in conjunction with him, and to pay the counsel out of the county treasury or the road fund that may be involved reasonable compensation, or if counsel so employed is retained on an annual basis as provided in this subsection, reasonable additional compensation for his services.

The board of supervisors shall have the power, in its discretion, to pay reasonable compensation to attorneys who may be employed by it in the matter of the issuance of bonds and the drafting of orders and resolutions in connection therewith. In no instance shall the attorney’s fee for the services exceed the following amounts, to wit:

One percent (1%) of the first Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) of any one (1) bond issue; one-half percent (1/2%) of the amount of the issue in excess of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) but not more than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); and one-fourth percent (1/4%) of the amount of the issue in excess of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). The limitations imposed in this paragraph shall not apply to any bond issue for which a declaration to issue the bonds has heretofore been adopted by proper resolution.

This subsection shall not in anyway amend or repeal or otherwise affect subsection (2) of this section, but this subsection shall remain in full force and effect.

The board of supervisors of any county, in addition to the authority conferred upon it in subsection (1) of this section, may employ, in its discretion, a firm of attorneys to represent it as its regular attorneys on the same terms, conditions and compensation as provided for employment of an attorney as its regular attorney. However, there shall not be both an attorney and a firm of attorneys employed at the same time as the regular attorney for the board.

In any county having a 1980 federal census population in excess of one hundred eighteen thousand (118,000), and in which is located a major refinery for the production of petroleum products and a facility for the construction of ships for the United States Navy; in any county which is traversed by an interstate highway and having a 1980 federal census population in excess of sixty-six thousand (66,000), and in which is located a comprehensive university operated by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and a National Guard training base; in any county in which is located the State Capitol and the state’s largest municipality; in any county which is traversed by Interstate Highway 55, United States Highway 51 and United States Highway 98; in any county bordering the Gulf of Mexico, having a 1980 federal census population in excess of one hundred fifty-seven thousand (157,000), and in which is located a state-owned port; and in any county which is traversed by Interstate Highway 20, United States Highway 49 and United States Highway 80, and in which is located the State Hospital and an international airport; all of which foregoing criteria the Legislature finds to be conducive to industrial development requiring the issuance of industrial revenue bonds and which counties would gain benefits by employment of counsel in the manner authorized by this subsection, the board of supervisors, as an alternative to the authority conferred upon it in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, may employ annually, in its discretion, an attorney as a full-time employee of the county, subject to the following conditions:

The attorney shall maintain an office in the county courthouse or other county-owned building and shall represent the board of supervisors and all county agencies responsible to the board;

The attorney shall be employed by the board of supervisors in the matter of the issuance of all bonds of the county and the drafting of resolutions in connection therewith, and shall represent the board in all state and federal courts. Attorney’s fees for the services which otherwise would have been paid to an attorney under paragraph (1)(c) of this section shall be paid into the county general fund and used to defray the salary of the attorney and his necessary office expenses;

During his employment by the county, the attorney shall not engage otherwise in the practice of civil or criminal law and shall not be associated with any other attorney or firm of attorneys;

The board of supervisors shall have the power, in its discretion, to pay the attorney an annual salary not to exceed the maximum annual salary authorized by law to be paid to the county judge of that county; and

The board of supervisors may authorize, in its discretion, the employment of special counsel to assist the counsel employed pursuant to this subsection, provided that the board shall determine and spread on its minutes that the employment of the special counsel is necessary and in the best interest of the county and setting forth the duties or responsibilities assigned to the special counsel.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 35; 1871, § 1385; 1880, § 2176; 1892, § 293; 1906, § 312; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3685; 1930, § 272; 1942, §§ 2958, 3374-95.5; Laws, 1924, ch. 212; Laws, 1936, ch. 308; Laws, 1942, ch. 218; Laws, 1946, chs. 182, 424; Laws, 1948, ch. 263; Laws, 1952, ch. 222; Laws, 1956, ch. 189; Laws, 1958, ch. 220; Laws, 1960, chs. 190, 191; Laws, 1962, chs. 248, 249; Laws, 1964, ch. 275, § 1; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess ch. 25, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 296, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 491; Laws, 1989, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 508, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1995).

§ 19-3-48.
Monthly office allowance for attorney employed by board.

The board of supervisors of any county in the state is authorized, in its discretion, to pay a monthly office allowance to the attorney employed by the board in an amount not exceeding the amount authorized to be paid for secretarial services for the county prosecuting attorney under Section 19-23-19.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 19-3-49.
Employment of counsel where there is no elected county prosecuting attorney; salary of Hancock County prosecuting attorney.

In all counties of this state wherein there is no elected county prosecuting attorney, the boards of supervisors shall have the power and authority to employ a competent attorney to appear and prosecute in cases requiring the services of the county prosecuting attorney. The compensation paid to the person so employed shall be paid from the general fund of such county and shall not exceed, during any calendar year, the amount authorized by law to be paid as salary to the county prosecuting attorney in such county. The employment of a county prosecuting attorney as authorized by this section shall be pursuant to a contract which shall provide that the salary of such county prosecuting attorney shall not be reduced, increased or terminated for the period of the contract. Such contract shall be for the period of the remainder of the term of office of the board of supervisors which employs the county prosecuting attorney; however, the contract shall provide expressly or by reference to this section that the contract shall be abrogated upon the creation and filling of the office of elected county prosecuting attorney.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, the board of supervisors of Hancock County may pay the attorney hired to appear and prosecute cases requiring the services of a county prosecuting attorney an annual salary of Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00). The Legislature finds and declares that the annual salary authorized by this section is justified in Hancock County for the following reasons:

The addition of a justice court judge in January 2004 created a total of three (3) judges in the county and requires the attorney hired to appear and prosecute cases requiring the services of a county prosecuting attorney to spend additional time in court; and

The population of Hancock County increased from thirty-one thousand seven hundred sixty (31,760) in 1990, to forty-two thousand nine hundred sixty-seven (42,967) in 2000, which placed it in the top ten percent (10%) of the fastest growing counties in the state; and

There was a significant increase in the number of cases filed in justice court and cases appealed to a higher court; and

The attorney hired to appear and prosecute cases requiring the services of a county prosecuting attorney is responsible for handling a large number of drug, alcohol and mental commitment proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2958.3; Laws, 1950, ch. 267; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 363, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 19-3-51.
Power of the board to subpoena witnesses and cite for contempt.

The board of supervisors shall have power to subpoena witnesses in all matters coming under its jurisdiction and to fine and imprison any person for a contempt committed while they are in session, the fine not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and the imprisonment not to extend beyond the continuance of the term. The person so fined or imprisoned may appeal to the circuit court, as in other cases, from the order or judgment of the board, and such appeal shall operate as a supersedeas.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 5 (8); 1857, ch. 59, art 9; 1871, § 1356; 1880, § 2138; 1892, § 283; 1906, § 301; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3674; 1930, § 206; 1942, § 2881.

§ 19-3-53.
Collection of fines imposed by board.

When a fine shall be imposed upon any person by the board of supervisors, by virtue of any provision of law, the board shall cause the person to be summoned to appear at a succeeding meeting to show cause why the judgment for such fine shall not be made final. If sufficient cause be not shown at the return-day of the summons, the judgment shall be made final, with costs, and the clerk shall issue a capias pro finem therefor, as for fines in the circuit court, which shall be made returnable at the next regular meeting of the board. If good cause be shown, the board may set aside the fine, upon payment of costs. The clerk and sheriff shall be entitled to like fees, for services, as upon similar proceedings in the circuit court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art 7 (42); 1857, ch. 15, art 36; 1871, § 2369; 1880, § 863; 1892, § 3936; 1906, § 4448; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7128; 1930, § 207; 1942, § 2882.

§ 19-3-55.
Elections for county purposes may be ordered by petition of qualified electors.

Unless otherwise specifically required by law, the board of supervisors of any county shall upon the filing of a petition touching any matter affecting the entire county and over which it has jurisdiction, signed by twenty-five per cent. of the qualified electors of the county, either pass an order putting said proposition in force and effect or immediately submit the same to a vote of the qualified electors of the county, after giving thirty days’ notice of said election, said notice to contain a statement of the proposition to be voted on at said election. If said election shall result in favor of the proposition petitioned for, the board of supervisors, shall pass the necessary order, to put the said proposition in force and effect. In the event the election shall result against the proposition submitted, no other election shall be held on the same, or substantially the same proposition within twelve months of the date of the prior election. This section shall not, however, apply to the creation of taxing districts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 310; 1942, § 3018; Laws, 1922, ch. 290.

§ 19-3-57.
Tickets; what shall be printed on same.

The tickets to be used in an election pursuant to Section 19-3-55 shall have a substantial synopsis of the proposition petitioned for, printed thereon, and next below shall have the words, “For the Proposition”; and the words, “Against the Proposition”, next below. In making up his ticket the voter shall, if he favors the proposition, make a cross (x) opposite the words, “For the Proposition” on his ticket, and if he does not favor the proposition, he shall make a cross (x) opposite the words, “Against the Proposition.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 311; 1942, § 3019; Laws, 1922, ch. 290.

§ 19-3-59.
Appropriation of county funds.

The board of supervisors shall direct the appropriation of money that may come into the county treasury, but shall not appropriate the same to an object not authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 30; 1871, § 1378; 1880, § 2158; 1892, § 317; 1906, § 338; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3711; 1930, § 256; 1942, § 2941.

§ 19-3-61.
Employment of comptroller or bookkeeper.

The board of supervisors in each county may employ and compensate at least one (1) qualified individual who shall serve as comptroller or bookkeeper for funds received, expended or handled by the board. The board may also employ and compensate such clerical assistance as the comptroller or bookkeeper may require to effectively discharge the duties imposed by this chapter, such compensation to be paid from the general fund, road funds or other available funds of such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 502, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 351, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1986).

§ 19-3-63.
Vacations and sick leave for county employees; payment or compensatory time for public safety employees for holidays; closure of county offices for funeral of deceased elected or appointed official.

The board of supervisors of each county by resolution adopted and placed on its minutes may establish a policy of sick leave and vacation time for employees of the county not inconsistent with the state laws regarding office hours and holidays.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, each elected official of the county, other than a member of the board of supervisors, who is authorized by law to employ, may, by written policy filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors, establish a policy of sick leave and vacation time for his employees which may be inconsistent with the policy established by the board of supervisors but which shall not be inconsistent with the state laws regarding office hours and holidays. If such elected official fails to adopt and file such a policy with the clerk of the board of supervisors, the policy adopted by the board of supervisors for sick leave and vacation time for county employees shall apply to employees of such elected official.

The board of supervisors of any county and each elected official of the county who is authorized by law to employ shall enact leave policies to ensure that a public safety employee is paid or granted compensatory time for the same number of holidays for which any other county employee is paid.

The board of supervisors of each county by resolution adopted and placed on its minutes may establish a policy to close county offices if an elected or appointed county official dies to allow county employees of the deceased elected or appointed official to attend the funeral of such deceased or appointed official.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 502, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 546, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 19-3-65.
Membership in national and state organizations of governmental officials.

The board of supervisors in each county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to do all things and to perform all acts which may be necessary to join the National Association of County Officials and/or State and County Administrator Association.

The board of supervisors in each county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to pay from the county general fund the required fees and dues for membership in the National Association of County Officials and the Mississippi Association of Supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 384, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1976).

§ 19-3-67.
Traveling expenses of supervisors.

When any member of any board of supervisors shall be required to travel outside of his county but within the State of Mississippi in the performance of his official duties, such member shall receive as expenses of such travel the same mileage and actual and necessary expenses for food, lodging and travel by public carrier or private motor vehicles as is allowed state officers and employees pursuant to the provisions of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. Provided, however, mileage shall not be authorized when such travel is done by a motor vehicle owned by the county.

When any member of any board of supervisors shall be required to travel outside the State of Mississippi in the performance of his official duties, such member shall receive as expenses of such travel the same mileage and actual and necessary expenses for food, lodging and travel by public carrier or private motor vehicles as is allowed state officers and employees pursuant to the provisions of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. Provided, however, such travel must receive the prior approval of the board before it is undertaken, and such approval shall be spread upon the minutes of the board.

Except as hereinafter provided with respect to mileage, no expenses shall be authorized or approved by any board of supervisors for travel by the member of such board within the county of such board. With respect to mileage, when travel within the county by a member of such board is done by a motor vehicle owned by the county, mileage shall not be authorized; however, when any member of such board does not have a county-owned motor vehicle regularly assigned to him for his use or when a county-owned motor vehicle is not otherwise available for his use at the time when travel is necessary, and he is required to travel within the county in the performance of his official duties using his private motor vehicle, then he may be reimbursed for mileage in the same manner as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Itemized expense accounts shall be submitted by the member on forms prescribed by the Auditor of Public Accounts for reimbursement of expenses for state officers and employees in such numbers as the county may require. No expenses authorized in this section shall be reimbursed unless the expenses have been authorized or approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the board duly made and spread upon the minutes of such board.

Expenses authorized in this section shall be published by the board of supervisors in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county; and, if no such newspaper is published in the county, then in a newspaper published elsewhere in the state which has a general circulation in such county. The publication shall be a detailed accounting of the expenses authorized to each member of the board. The cost of publishing such expense accounts shall be paid by the county pursuant to the provisions of Section 19-3-35.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 461; Laws, 1984, ch. 432; Laws, 1996, ch. 456, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 19-3-68.
Supervisors and county employees authorized to use credit cards to pay travel expenses.

The board of supervisors of any county may acquire one or more credit cards which may be used by members of the board of supervisors and county employees to pay expenses incurred by them when traveling in or out of the state in the performance of their official duties. The chancery clerk or county purchase clerk shall maintain complete records of all credit card numbers and all receipts and other documents relating to the use of such credit cards. The supervisors and county employees shall furnish receipts for the use of such credit cards each month to the chancery clerk or purchase clerk who shall submit a written report monthly to the board of supervisors. The report shall include an itemized list of all expenditures and use of the credit cards for the month, and such expenditures may be allowed for payment by the county in the same manner as other items on the claims docket. The issuance of a credit card to a supervisor or county employee under the provisions of this section does not authorize the supervisor or county employee to use the credit card to make any expenditure that is not otherwise authorized by law. Any supervisor or county employee who uses the credit card to make an expenditure that is not approved for payment by the board shall be personally liable for the expenditure and shall reimburse the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 511, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 29, 2001.).

§ 19-3-69.
Authority to contract for professional services.

The board of supervisors of each county may, in its discretion, contract with certain professionals when the board determines that such professional services are necessary and in the best interest of the county.

The board of supervisors shall spread upon its minutes its finding that the professional services are necessary and in the best interest of the county. The contract for professional services shall be approved by the attorney for the board of supervisors and made a part of the minutes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of supervisors may request and consider the price of the services in its initial and subsequent contact with professionals.

A professional within the meaning of this section shall be limited to:

Attorneys at law, admitted to practice law in this state by the State Board of Bar Admissions;

Accountants, certified by the State Board of Public Accountancy;

Architects, licensed by the State Board of Architecture;

Engineers and land surveyors, registered by the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors;

Physicians, licensed by the State Board of Medical Licensure;

Appraisers, licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Commission or as otherwise provided by law or ad valorem appraisers holding the MAE designation from the Department of Revenue;

Real estate brokers, licensed by the Mississippi Real Estate Commission;

In the sale of personal property pursuant to the provisions of Section 19-7-5, auctioneers who meet standards established by the State Department of Audit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 366; Laws, 1990, ch. 532, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 413, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 19-3-71.
Appointment of county fire services coordinator.

The board of supervisors in each county shall appoint a county fire services coordinator, and may compensate him from any available county funds, except insurance rebate monies from the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund. The county fire services coordinator shall demonstrate that he possesses fire-related knowledge and experience as well as meeting the guidelines established by the Commissioner of Insurance. The director of the local organization for emergency management serving the county may be the coordinator if he meets the criteria provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 19-3-73.
Authority of county to maintain real property owned or leased by fire protection district.

In addition to the maintenance authority granted in Section 83-1-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, the board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to grade, gravel, shell and/or maintain real property, including roads or driveways thereof, owned by a municipal fire protection district or county fire protection district, or leased for a term of not less than twenty (20) years by a municipal fire protection district or a county fire protection district, as necessary for the effective and safe operation of such district. Any action taken by the board of supervisors under the authority of this section shall be spread upon the minutes of the board of supervisors when the work is authorized.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 596, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 19-3-75.
Maintenance of roads or driveways to public cemeteries.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to grade, gravel or shell and/or to repair and maintain roads or driveways to public cemeteries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 493, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 3, 1988).

§ 19-3-77.
Programs of professional education for county purchase clerks, receiving clerks, inventory control clerks, and members of county boards of supervisors.

There are hereby established programs of professional education for county purchase clerks, receiving clerks and inventory control clerks. The programs shall be offered at least every four (4) years at the beginning of terms of office for county elected officials and at other times when the State Auditor has been notified by a board of supervisors that a vacancy in the position of purchase clerk, receiving clerk or inventory control clerk has been filled with an uncertified appointee. The curriculum for each program shall be designed by the State Auditor. Program administration, coordination, delivery and attendance verification shall be conducted by the Community Development Department of the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service. The professional education programs offered at the beginning of terms of office shall be scheduled in each planning and development district; provided, however, the Community Development Department may schedule a program in one geographical area encompassing several planning and development districts rather than scheduling separate programs in each planning and development district within that geographical area. Participants who successfully complete a program shall be certified by the State Auditor and shall display the certificate awarded in a prominent public place within their offices.

Any participant who travels outside the county of his employment to attend a professional education program shall receive as reimbursement of the expense of such travel the same mileage and actual and necessary expenses for food, lodging and travel as allowed state officers and employees pursuant to Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972; however mileage shall not be allowed when travel is by motor vehicle owned by the county.

All or any part of the expense of a professional education program may be defrayed by the imposition of fees in a reasonable amount established by the State Auditor. Any fees imposed to defray expenses of a professional education program shall be paid by the county for participants.

There is hereby established a program of professional education for members of county boards of supervisors. The program shall be offered at the beginning of each term of office for members of the boards of supervisors and may be offered more frequently at the discretion of the Committee on Supervisor Education. The curriculum of the program shall be designed by the Committee on Supervisor Education, which shall be composed of the following members:

Two (2) members from the State Department of Audit designated by the State Auditor.

Two (2) members from the Mississippi Association of Supervisors designated by the executive director of the association.

One (1) member from the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service designated by the director of the service.

One (1) member from the Stennis Institute of Government at Mississippi State University designated by the director of the institute.

One (1) member from the Judicial College of the University of Mississippi designated by the director of the judicial college.

One (1) member from the Public Policy and Administration Program at Jackson State University designated by the Chairman of the Department of Political Science.

Program administration, coordination, delivery and attendance verification shall be conducted by the Community Development Department of the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service in cooperation with the Mississippi Association of Supervisors. All or any part of the expense of the supervisor education program may be defrayed by the imposition of fees established by the Committee on Supervisor Education.

The primary resources for the supervisor education program shall be the State Department of Audit, the State Attorney General, the Judicial College of the University of Mississippi, the Stennis Institute of Government at Mississippi State University, the Public Policy and Administration Program at Jackson State University, the Mississippi Research and Development Center or its successor, and any other federal, state, local or university entities having expertise in specific topical areas.

Any fees imposed to defray expenses of the supervisor education program shall be paid by the county for members of the board of supervisors of such county enrolled in the program; and, additionally, when any supervisor travels outside of his county to attend a school, seminar or workshop approved by the Committee on Supervisor Education, he shall receive as reimbursement of expenses of such travel the same mileage and actual and necessary expenses for food, lodging and travel by public carrier or private motor vehicles as is allowed state officers and employees pursuant to the provisions of Section 25-3-41; however, mileage shall not be authorized when such travel is done by a motor vehicle owned by the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 31; Laws, 1993, ch. 595, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 19-3-79.
Notice of intent to apply for gaming license; publication of notice; resolution authorizing gaming when no petition filed; petition to hold election on allowing legal gaming on cruise vessels; referendum; form of ballots; absence of petition or vote in favor of gaming; vote against gaming not to affect existing gaming operations.

Any person, corporation or other legal entity required to obtain a state gaming license to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as defined in Section 27-109-1, as prescribed by the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall, before applying for such license, provide the Mississippi Gaming Commission with a written notice of intent to apply for a license. The “notice of intent to apply for a gaming license” shall be on a form prescribed by the executive director of the commission and shall state the county in which the intending licensee desires to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as the case may be. Within ten (10) days after receipt of a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license, the commission shall require such person, corporation or legal entity to publish the notice once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the intending licensee desires to conduct legal gaming aboard a cruise vessel or vessel, as the case may be.

If no petition as prescribed in subsection (3) of this section is filed with the board of supervisors of the applicable county within thirty (30) days after the date of the last publication, the board of supervisors of such county shall adopt a resolution stating that no petition was timely filed and that legal gaming may henceforth be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in such county.

If a petition signed by twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the registered voters of a county in which a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license is published is filed within thirty (30) days of the date of the last publication with the circuit clerk of the applicable county, the board of supervisors of such county shall authorize the circuit clerk to hold an election on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county on the date upon which such an election may be conducted under subsection (7). The referendum shall be advertised, held, conducted and the result thereof canvassed in the manner provided by law for advertising, holding and canvassing county elections.

At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote. The ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the purpose of the election and the words “FOR LEGAL GAMING ABOARD CRUISE VESSELS (OR VESSELS) IN THE COUNTY AS PRESCRIBED BY LAW,” and “AGAINST LEGAL GAMING ABOARD CRUISE VESSELS (OR VESSELS) IN THE COUNTY AS PRESCRIBED BY LAW.” The voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check (Π) mark opposite his choice on the proposition. If a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election shall vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, then legal gaming may henceforth be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county. If less than a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election shall vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county, then gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, shall be prohibited in the county until such time as a subsequent election, held according to the restrictions specified in subsection (7), may authorize such legal gaming.

In any county in which no petition is timely filed after a notice of intent to apply for a gaming license is published, or in which an election is held on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county and a majority of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in the county, no election shall thereafter be held in that county pursuant to this section on the proposition of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in that county.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or Sections 97-33-1, 97-33-7, 97-33-17, 97-33-25 and 97-33-27 to the contrary, if an election is held pursuant to this section which causes the conducting of gaming aboard cruise vessels to be prohibited in any county in which one or more cruise vessels were operating out of a port in the county on the effective date of this chapter, the prohibition on the conducting of gaming aboard cruise vessels in that county shall not apply to the conducting of legal gaming aboard any of those cruise vessels which were still operating out of a port in that county at the time of the election.

If an election has been held on the issue of allowing legal gaming to be conducted aboard cruise vessels or vessels, as the case may be, in a county, and the authority to conduct such legal gaming has been denied by the electors of such county, then a subsequent election on such issue may not be held until:

The date of the next succeeding general election in which the election for President of the United States occurs; or

In the case in which the authority to conduct such legal gaming has been denied by the electors of such county at elections on three (3) different occasions, whether those occasions be successive or not, the date of the next succeeding general election occurring at least eight (8) years after the last of the three (3) occasions on which the electors denied the authority to conduct such legal gaming.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 481, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 449, § 9; Laws, 1990, Ex Sess, ch. 45, § 145; Laws, 1993, ch. 588, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after June 23, 1997 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).